Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 406.505 is amended to read:
406.505. (1) The World  War II memorial constructed in the Capitol Mall in the City of Salem,
Marion County, is an outright permitted use without taking an exception under ORS 197.732 to  the
statewide land use planning goals or changing the acknowledged  comprehensive plan or land use
regulations of Marion County.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall :
(a) Maintain the finished memorial ;
(b) Make such modifications as necessary to keep the memorial up to date; and
(c) Develop and maintain an accessible  educational tool as part of the memorial that
provides historical context and information on World War II and  the service members and
civilians who served during the war, including civilians recognized by the United States De-
partment of Defense for contributing to the defense of Wake Island during the war.
(3) Modifications  necessary to keep the memorial up to date may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Adding names of service members who meet the criteria under subsection  (4) of this
section to the memorial; and
(b) Other improvements to the memorial as approved  by the Director of Veterans’ Af-
fairs.
(4)(a) A  service member’s name may be added to the memorial if military personnel re-
cords confirm that the service member  was killed in action in World War II and was either
born in Oregon, enlisted in Oregon  or had established residency in Oregon prior to
enlistment.
(b) A service member is considered killed in  action if the service member died in theater
and:
(A) The service member’s death was caused by enemy action;
(B) The service member died of wounds sustained from enemy action;
(C) The service member’s death occurred  while the service member was a prisoner of
war; or
(D) The service member became and remained missing in action  during World War II
combat operations against the enemy during the period from May 27, 1941, to  January 31,
1946.
Enrolled House Bill 2344 (HB 2344-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2344 (HB 2344-A) Page 2